Maine, session 132, LD1817.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 15 MRSA §1023, sub-§4, ¶D, as amended by PL 2015, c. 436, §1, is
repealed.
Sec. 2. 15 MRSA §1026, sub-§3, ¶B-1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 405, Pt. E, §§1
and 2, is further amended by repealing subparagraph (3).
Sec. 3. 15 MRSA §1026, sub-§3, ¶B-1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 405, Pt. E,
§§1and 2, is further amended by amending subparagraph (4) to read:
(4) That is a violation of a condition of release premised on an allegation of
represents new criminal conduct committed while the person was released on
preconviction or post-conviction bail;
Sec. 4. 15 MRSA §1092, as amended by PL 2023, c. 293, §1, is repealed.
Sec. 5. 15 MRSA §6203, sub-§1, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 199, §1, is
amended to read:
C. To prosecute a survivor for any crime of failure to appear, or failure to report or
violation of condition of release under sections section 1091, or 1091‑A and 1092,
respectively;
Sec. 6. 15 MRSA §6203, sub-§2, ¶C, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 199, §1, is
amended to read:
C. Any crime of failure to appear, or failure to report or violation of condition of
release under sections section 1091, or 1091‑A or 1092, respectively;
Sec. 7. 17-A MRSA §15, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2023, c. 465, §1, is further
amended by repealing subparagraph (10).
Sec. 8. 17-A MRSA §207-A, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 465, §3, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (3) to read:
(3) Has one or more prior convictions for violating former Title 15, section 1092,
subsection 1, paragraph B when the condition of release violated is specified in
Title 15, section 1026, subsection 3, paragraph A, subparagraph (5) or (8) when
the alleged victim in the case for which the defendant was on bail was a family or
household member as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102, subsection 6 or a dating
partner as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102, subsection 4; or
Sec. 9. 17-A MRSA §209-A, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 465, §8, is
further amended by amending subparagraph (3) to read:
(3) Has one or more prior convictions for violating former Title 15, section 1092,
subsection 1, paragraph B when the condition of release violated is specified in
Title 15, section 1026, subsection 3, paragraph A, subparagraph (5) or (8) when
the alleged victim in the case for which the defendant was on bail was a family or
household member as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102, subsection 6 or a dating
partner as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102, subsection 4; or
Sec. 10. 17-A MRSA §210-B, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 465, §10,
is further amended by amending subparagraph (3) to read:
Page 1 - 132LR2470(01)

(3) Has one or more prior convictions for violating former Title 15, section 1092,
subsection 1, paragraph B when the condition of release violated is specified in
Title 15, section 1026, subsection 3, paragraph A, subparagraph (5) or (8) when
the alleged victim in the case for which the defendant was on bail was a family or
household member as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102, subsection 6 or a dating
partner as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102, subsection 4; or
Sec. 11. 17-A MRSA §210-C, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 465, §12,
is further amended by amending subparagraph (3) to read:
(3) Has one or more prior convictions for violating former Title 15, section 1092,
subsection 1, paragraph B when the condition of release violated is specified in
Title 15, section 1026, subsection 3, paragraph A, subparagraph (5) or (8) when
the alleged victim in the case for which the defendant was on bail was a family or
household member as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102, subsection 6 or a dating
partner as defined in Title 19-A, section 4102, subsection 4; or
Sec. 12. 17-A MRSA §211-A, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2023, c. 465, §14,
is further amended by amending subparagraph (3) to read:
(3) Has one or more prior convictions for violating former Title 15, section 1092,
subsection 1, paragraph B when the condition of release violated is specified in
Title 15, section 1026, subsection 3, paragraph A, subparagraph (5) or (8) when
the alleged victim in the case for which the defendant was on bail was a family or
household member as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102, subsection 6 or a dating
partner as defined in Title 19‑A, section 4102, subsection 4; or
Sec. 13. 17-A MRSA §1802, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 447, §4 and
c. 647, Pt. B, §38 and affected by §65, is further amended by amending subparagraph (9)
to read:
(9) A Class D or Class E crime under Title 29‑A, section 2411, subsection 1‑A,
paragraph B; or
Sec. 14. 17-A MRSA §1802, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 447, §4 and
c. 647, Pt. B, §38 and affected by §65, is further amended by amending subparagraph (10)
to read:
(10) A Class D crime under Title 17, section 1031; or
Sec. 15. 17-A MRSA §1802, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2021, c. 447, §4 and
c. 647, Pt. B, §38 and affected by §65, is further amended by repealing subparagraph (11).
Sec. 16. 25 MRSA §6001, sub-§1, ¶I, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 394, §1, is
amended by amending subparagraph (1), division (b) to read:
(b) Is a Class D or Class E crime under the laws of this State that is a violation
of Title 17‑A, chapter 9, 11, 12, 13 or 35; Title 15, section 1092, if the violation
is based on a condition under Title 15, section 1026, subsection 3, paragraph
A, subparagraph (5) or (8); or Title 19‑A, section 4011; or
Page 2 - 132LR2470(01)